Nevada, session 83, AB198.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 597 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 to 13.5, inclusive, of
this act.
Sec. 2. As used in sections 2 to 13.5, inclusive, of this act,
unless the context otherwise requires, the words and terms defined
in sections 3, 4 and 5 of this act have the meanings ascribed to
them in those sections.
Sec. 3. “Inflatable device” means an air-filled device that:
1. Incorporates a structural and mechanical system and
employs a high-strength fabric or film that achieves its strength,
shape and stability by tensioning from internal air pressure;
2. Is intended for use by a person to bounce, play, slide, climb
or otherwise interact for outdoor recreation; and
3. Includes, without limitation, a constant air inflatable
bounce house, inflatable slide or water slide, obstacle course, pool
or enclosed inflatable trampoline.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
Sec. 4. “Operator” means a person on-site at the location
where an inflatable device is used who sets up, operates, maintains
or supervises the use of the inflatable device on behalf of an
operator business.
Sec. 5. “Operator business” means a business entity,
including, without limitation, a sole proprietorship, that:
1. Is engaged in the business of making inflatable devices
available for use in this State; and
2. Employs, controls, directs or hires as an independent
contractor an operator to act on behalf of the business entity.
Sec. 6. A person shall not engage in the business of an
operator business unless the person:
1. Holds all applicable state and local business licenses; and
2. Has obtained a liability insurance policy, or a certificate of
insurance thereof, or a bond of a surety company or other surety
in an amount not less than $1,000,000.
Sec. 7. 1. An operator business shall keep a logbook for
any inflatable device which is made available for use by the
operator business. The logbook may be written or electronic, but
must be available in a form that is kept with the inflatable device
at all times and must be available for inspection at the request of
any customer of the business, user of the inflatable device or any
state or local agency.
2. An operator shall record and retain for not less than 2
years the results of each inspection conducted pursuant to section
8 of this act in the logbook.
3. If an operator or operator business temporarily or
permanently discontinues the operation or use of an inflatable
device for any of the reasons described in sections 8 to 11,
inclusive, of this act, or described in any user manual provided by
the manufacturer of the inflatable device, the operator shall
record that information in the logbook.
Sec. 8. 1. Before allowing any person to use an inflatable
device, the operator shall conduct an inspection of the inflatable
device and the location where the inflatable device will be used, in
accordance with:
(a) The requirements of sections 9, 10 and 11 of this act; and
(b) The requirements or recommendations contained in any:
(1) User manual and any update to any user manual
provided by the manufacturer of the inflatable device; and
(2) Information provided in connection with a recall of the
inflatable device.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
2. The operator shall not allow any person to use the
inflatable device if the inspection reveals, or if a reasonable
inspection would have revealed, a hazard or potential hazard that
would make use of the inflatable device unsafe according to the
requirements of section 9, 10 or 11 of this act or the requirements
or recommendations described in paragraph (b) of subsection 1.
Sec. 9. 1. An operator shall inspect an inflatable device
before allowing any person to use the inflatable device to ensure
all original labels attached to the inflatable device by the
manufacturer remain attached and are legible. If any label
attached by the manufacturer is missing or illegible, use of the
inflatable device must be permanently discontinued and the
inflatable device must be destroyed.
2. An operator business shall not sell or transfer an inflatable
device unless all labels attached by the manufacturer are attached
to the inflatable device and legible and the following is provided to
the purchaser or transferee:
(a) Any user manual and any update to any user manual
provided by the manufacturer of the inflatable device; and
(b) Any information provided in connection with a recall of the
inflatable device.
Sec. 10. 1. An operator shall not allow any person to use
an inflatable device at a location if the wind speed at the location
exceeds the greater of:
(a) The recommendation of the manufacturer for the specific
inflatable device in use; or
(b) 15 miles per hour.
2. The operator shall use an anemometer to measure the
wind speed and shall record the wind speed in the logbook
maintained pursuant to section 7 of this act before allowing any
person to use the inflatable device.
3. At all times while the inflatable device is in use, the
operator shall continue to monitor the wind speed at the location
by using an anemometer. If at any time during the use of the
device the wind speed exceeds the limits described in subsection 1,
the operator shall discontinue the use of and deflate the inflatable
device. The operator shall not allow any person to use the
inflatable device unless the wind speed falls back within the limits
described in subsection 1.
Sec. 11. 1. The operator shall ensure an inflatable device is
anchored to the ground before and at all times during the use of
the device.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 5 –
2. To secure each point where the inflatable device is
anchored to the ground, the operator shall use:
(a) Stakes which are:
(1) Made of noncorrosive metal;
(2) Designed for use as ground anchors and appropriate for
anchoring the inflatable device under the circumstances; and
(3) Not less than 18 inches long and driven into the ground
at not less than a 22-degree angle towards the center of the
inflatable device, unless the recommendations of the
manufacturer for the specific device require stakes which are
longer; or
(b) Weights which are not less than 75 pounds per anchor
point, unless the recommendations of the manufacturer for the
specific device require a heavier weight.
Sec. 12. An operator shall display in a conspicuous place in
front of an inflatable device at all times during the use of the
device a legible and typewritten sign which is labeled
“OPERATOR’S WARNING” in red and in not less than 72-point
boldface type. The sign must be not less than 2 feet in length and
in width and must contain the following information in a type and
font that is easy to read and in substantially the following form:
1. Use of an inflatable device can cause injury or death.
2. A logbook of safety inspections for this inflatable device is
available for review upon the request of any customer of the
business, user of the inflatable device or any state or local agency.
3. The maximum allowable wind speed for the safe operation
of an inflatable device is the greater of:
(a) The recommendation of the manufacturer of the inflatable
device; or
(b) 15 miles per hour.
4. The operator is required to use and keep available for use
an anemometer to monitor wind speed before and at all times
during use of this device. If the wind speed exceeds the maximum
allowable wind speed for the safe operation of this device, the
operator is required to discontinue use of the device.
5. This inflatable device must be anchored to the ground
during use. To secure each point where the device is anchored to
the ground, the operator shall use:
(a) Stakes which are:
(1) Made of noncorrosive metal;
(2) Designed for use as ground anchors and appropriate for
anchoring the inflatable device under the circumstances; and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 6 –
(3) Not less than 18 inches long and driven into the ground
at not less than a 22-degree angle towards the center of the
inflatable device, unless the recommendations of the
manufacturer for this device require stakes which are longer; or
(b) Weights which are not less than 75 pounds per anchor
point, unless the recommendations of the manufacturer for this
device require a heavier weight.
6. The maximum number of users of this inflatable device is
determined by the recommendations of the manufacturer
according to the warning labels attached to the device.
Sec. 13. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 13.5. The governing body of a county, city or town may:
1. Enact an ordinance which:
(a) Establishes requirements and restrictions with respect to
operators and operator businesses which are:
(1) The same as those set forth in sections 2 to 13.5,
inclusive, of this act; or
(2) In addition to those set forth in sections 2 to 13.5,
inclusive, of this act, as the governing body determines are
necessary; and
(b) Provides for the imposition of criminal or civil penalties, or
both, for any violation of an ordinance enacted pursuant to this
subsection.
2. Use any portion of the fees which are collected for the
issuance of any business license required by the county, city or
town to enforce any ordinance enacted pursuant to subsection 1.
Sec. 14. This act becomes effective on January 1, 2026.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)